Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PUBLIC TELEVISION.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of administration must consider the recommendations of the Minnesota Public Television Association before allocating the amounts appropriated in paragraphs (b) to (d) for matching grants and equipment grants. new text end new text begin (b) $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for matching grants for public television under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. new text end new text begin (c) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for public television equipment grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. new text end new text begin (d) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for block grants to public television under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. new text end